Utah statutes.
15-2-3.   Limitation on right to disaffirm.

No contract can be thus disaffirmed in cases where, on account of the minor's own misrepresentations as to his majority or from his having engaged in business as adult, the other party had good reason to believe the minor capable of contracting.



No Change Since 1953

